Utah statutes.
78B-6-1222.   Distribution of proceeds or securities.

The proceeds of sale and the securities taken by the referees shall be distributed by the referees to the persons entitled to them whenever the court directs.  If no direction for distribution is given, all of the proceeds and securities must be paid into the court.

